Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,198
Extremely hazardous substance, defined.

Extremely hazardous substance means a substance which meets the threshold requirements identified on the List of Extremely Hazardous Substances under 40 C.F.R. part 355, Appendices A and B.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 8.